Maryland, session 2026, HB0777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
22–422.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “REAR OCCUPANT ALERT SYSTEM” MEANS A SYSTEM
THAT ALERTS THE OPERATOR OF A MOTOR VEHICLE TO INSPECT THE
REAR–DESIGNATED SEATING POSITIONS OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE AFTER THE
OPERATOR DEACTIVATES THE VEHICLE’S ENGINE OR MOTOR.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A MOTOR VEHICLE WITH
REAR–DESIGNATED SEATING POSITIONS THAT IS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0777*

HOUSE BILL 777
(1) MANUFACTURED OR ASSEMBLED AT LEAST 1 YEAR AFTER THE
DATE ON WHICH THE NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION
PROMULGATES FINAL REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING STANDARDS FOR REAR
OCCUPANT ALERT SYSTEMS; AND
(2) REGISTERED, OR OF A TYPE CAPABLE OF BEING REGISTERED, IN
THE STATE AS:
(I) A CLASS A (PASSENGER) VEHICLE;
(II) A CLASS E (TRUCK) VEHICLE; OR
(III) A CLASS M (MULTIPURPOSE) VEHICLE.
(C) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL OR OFFER FOR SALE IN THE STATE A
MOTOR VEHICLE THAT IS TO BE REGISTERED IN THE STATE UNLESS THE MOTOR
VEHICLE IS EQUIPPED WITH A REAR OCCUPANT ALERT SYSTEM THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS SET BY THE NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY
ADMINISTRATION.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT REGISTER A MOTOR VEHICLE
SOLD IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO
CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING PROCEDURES FOR
DOCUMENTATION OF COMPLIANCE AT THE TIME OF SALE OR REGISTRATION.
(E) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT ENFORCE THIS SECTION IF A FEDERAL
AGENCY DETERMINES IN WRITING THAT ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SECTION WOULD
CAUSE THE STATE TO BE INELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE ANY FEDERAL FUNDS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2029.